nb: Krokdesign: Dobbeltsidig; Fast; Skrue; Vår; Swing; Svingbar; Annet
hu: Horog kialakítása: Kétvégű; Rögzített; Csavar; Rugó; Lengő; Forgó; Egyéb
pl: Konstrukcja haka: Dwustronny; Stałe; Śruba; Sprężyna; Swing; Rotacja; Inne
vi: Thiết kế móc: Hai đầu; Cố định; Đinh vít; Mùa xuân; Swing; Lốp xoay; Khác
el: Σχεδιασμός γάντζου: Διπλού άκρου; Σταθερή; Βιδωτή; Ελατήριο; Κούνια; Περιστροφή; Άλλο
ro-RO: Design agrafă: Cu două capete; Fix; Șurub; Arc; Rotativ; Pivotant; Altele
hr-HR: Dizajn kuke: Dvostrano; Fiksno; Vijak; Opruga; Viseća; Zakretna; Ostalo
ja: フックの種類: ダブルエンド; 固定; ネジ; 春; スイング; スイベル; その他
zh-TW: 掛鉤設計: 單端; 固定; 螺旋式; 春天; 搖擺樂; 萬向型; 其他
pt-PT: Design de gancho: Dupla extremidade; Fixo; Parafuso; Primavera; Swing; Torniquete; Outro
en: Hook design: Double-ended; Fixed; Screw; Spring; Swing; Swivel; Other
da: Krogdesign: Dobbeltendet; Fast; Skrue; Forår; Swing; Drejelig; Andet
lt-LT: Kabliuko dizainas: Dvipusė; Fiksuotas; Įsukamas; Spyruoklinis; Paslankus; Sukamas; Kita
ko: 후크 디자인: 양면; 고정; 나사; 봄; 스윙; 스위블; 기타
th: การออกแบบตะขอ: สองด้าน; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; สกรู; ฤดูใบไม้ผลิ; สวิง; ล้อเลื่อน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 挂钩设计: 双头; 固定; 螺丝; 春季; 摇摆; 旋转式; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do gancho: Duas pontas; Fixo; Parafuso; Primavera; Swing; Giratório; Outro
es: Diseño del gancho: Doble punta; Fijo; Tornillo; Primavera; Swing; Giratorio; Otros
it: Design del gancio: A doppia estremità; Fisso; Vite; Primavera; Swing; Girevole; Altro
sk-SK: Dizajn háčika: Obojstranný; Pripevnený; Skrutkový; Pružina; Výkyvný; Otočný; Iné
sl-SI: Zasnova kavlja: Dvostranski; Fiksna; Navojni; Vzmet; Viseča; Vrtljiva; Drugo
tr: Kanca tasarımı: Çift uçlu; Sabit; Vida; İlkbahar; Swing; Tablalı; Diğer
cs: Design háčku: Oboustranná; Pevný; Šroub; Jaro; Swing; Otočná; Jiné
sv: Krokutförande: Dubbelsidig; Fast; Skruv; Vår; Swing; Snurra; Övrigt
ru: Конструкция крюка: Двусторонний; Несъемный; Винтовой; Пружинный; Качающийся; Поворотный; Другой
nl: Ontwerp haak: Dubbelzijdig; Vast; Schroef; Lente; Swing; Draaibaar; Andere
de: Design des Hakens: Doppelende; Befestigt; Schraube; Frühling; Swing; Wirbel; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Дизайн на кука: Двустранно; Фиксиран; Винт; Пружина; Люлка; Въртяща се; Други
fr: Conception de crochet: Double extrémité; Fixé; Vis; Printemps; Swing; Pivot; Autre
fi: Koukun muotoilu: Kaksipäinen; Pysyvä; Ruuvi; kevät; Swing; Kääntyvä; Muu